District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.104

Foreign corporations — Filing of certificate of authority.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 221, ch. 269, § 104
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 23
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ll), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.104.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.5.
1973 Ed., § 29-933e.